en: Food & Drink Stencils
xx: Food & Drink Stencils
cs: Šablony na nápoje a jídla
da: Skabeloner til dekoration af mad og drikkevarer
de: Lebensmittelschablonen
es: Plantillas para comida y bebida
fr: Pochoirs pour aliments et boissons
it: Stencil per alimenti e bevande
ja: 食品・飲料用ステンシル
nl: Culinaire strooisjablonen
no: Sjablong for mat og drikke
pl: Szablony do potraw i napojów
pt: Estêncil para comidas e bebidas
ru: Трафареты для украшения блюд и напитков
sv: Mat- och dryckesschabloner
tr: Yiyecek ve İçecek Kalıpları

en: Food Crackers
xx: Food Crackers
cs: Kleště na potraviny
da: Spisekiks
de: Spezialbesteck & Nussknacker
es: Tenazas para alimentos
fr: Écraseurs à aliments
it: Tritatutto
ja: 殻割り器
nl: Voedselkrakers
no: Matknekkere
pl: Szczypce do rozłupywania
pt: Moedores de alimentos
ru: Кухонные щипцы
sv: Matknäckare
tr: Yiyecek Parçalayıcılar

en: Lobster & Crab Crackers
xx: Lobster & Crab Crackers
cs: Kleště na humry a kraby
da: Hummer- og krabbeknækkere
de: Hummer- & Krebszangen
es: Pinzas para mariscos
fr: Pinces à crustacés
it: Pinze per aragoste e granchi
ja: カニ・ロブスター殻割り機
nl: Kreeft- en krabbenkrakers
no: Hummer- og krabbeknekkere
pl: Szczypce do rozłupywania homarów i krabów
pt: Quebradores de lagostas e caranguejos
ru: Щипцы для лобстеров и крабов
sv: Hummer- och krabbknäckare
tr: Istakoz ve Yengeç Parçalayıcılar

en: Nutcrackers
xx: Nutcrackers
cs: Louskáčky
da: Nøddeknækkere
de: Nussknacker
es: Cascanueces
fr: Casse-noisettes
it: Schiaccianoci
ja: クルミ割り器
nl: Notenkrakers
no: Nøtteknekkere
pl: Dziadki do orzechów
pt: Quebra-nozes
ru: Орехоколы
sv: Nötknäckare
tr: Fındıkkıranlar

en: Decorative Nutcrackers
xx: Decorative Nutcrackers
cs: Ozdobné louskáčky
da: Dekorative nøddeknækkere
de: Dekorative Nussknacker
es: Cascanueces decorativos
fr: Casse-noisettes décoratifs
it: Schiaccianoci decorativi
ja: クルミ割り人形
nl: Decoratieve notenkrakers
no: Dekorative nøtteknekkere
pl: Ozdobne dziadki do orzechów
pt: Quebra-nozes decorativos
ru: Декоративные орехоколы
sv: Dekorativa nötknäckare
tr: Dekoratif Fındıkkıranlar

en: Food Dispensers
xx: Food Dispensers
cs: Dávkovače potravin
da: Fødevarebeholdere
de: Nahrungsmittelspender
es: Dispensadores de comida
fr: Distributeurs d'aliments
it: Dispenser per alimenti
ja: フードディスペンサー
nl: Voedselautomaten
no: Matdispensere
pl: Dozowniki spożywcze
pt: Armários para alimentos
ru: Пищевые дозаторы
sv: Matautomater
tr: Yiyecek Dispenserleri

en: Food Graters & Zesters
xx: Food Graters & Zesters
cs: Struhadla a škrabadla
da: Rivejern
de: Reiben
es: Ralladores de comida
fr: Râpes et zesteurs
it: Grattugia e grattugialimoni
ja: おろし器
nl: Voedselraspen en zesteurs
no: Rivjern og rasper
pl: Skrobaki do żywności
pt: Raladores descascadores
ru: Терки и измельчители пищи
sv: Mathyvlar och rivjärn
tr: Yiyecek Rendeleri ve Narenciye Soyacağı

en: Food Peelers & Corers
xx: Food Peelers & Corers
cs: Škrabky a vykrajovátka
da: Skrælleknive
de: Schäler & Entkerner
es: Peladores y descorazonadores
fr: Éplucheurs et évideurs
it: Pelatrici e snocciolatrici
ja: ピーラー・芯抜き器
nl: Schilmessen en appelboren
no: Skrellere og kjernefjernere
pl: Obieraczki i wydrążacze
pt: Descascadores de alimentos
ru: Приспособления для снятия кожуры и удаления сердцевины
sv: Matskalare och urkärningsverktyg
tr: Soyma Bıçakları ve Oyacaklar

en: Food Steaming Bags
xx: Food Steaming Bags
cs: Varné sáčky
da: Poser til dampning af fødevarer
de: Dampfgarbeutel
es: Bolsas de cocción al vapor
fr: Sacs de cuisson vapeur
it: Sacchetti per la cottura a vapore
ja: スチーム料理用バッグ
nl: Stoomzakken
no: Poser til dampkoking
pl: Torebki do gotowania na parze
pt: Sacos para cozimento a vapor
ru: Паровые пакеты
sv: Påsar för ångkokning
tr: Gıda Buharda Pişirme Poşetleri

en: Food Sticks & Skewers
xx: Food Sticks & Skewers
cs: Špejle a jehly na potraviny
da: Madpinde og kødnåle
de: Allespicker & Spieße
es: Pinchos y brochetas para comida
fr: Pics et brochettes alimentaires
it: Stecchi e spiedi per alimenti
ja: 串
nl: Prikkers en spiezen voor voedsel
no: Matpinner og -spyd
pl: Rożna
pt: Espetos
ru: Кулинарные шампуры и шпажки
sv: Matspett
tr: Yiyecek Çubuk ve Şişleri

en: Funnels
xx: Funnels
cs: Trychtýře
da: Tragte
de: Küchentrichter
es: Embudos
fr: Entonnoirs
it: Imbuti
ja: じょうご
nl: Trechters
no: Trakter
pl: Lejki
pt: Funis
ru: Воронки
sv: Trattar
tr: Huniler

en: Garlic Presses
xx: Garlic Presses
cs: Lisy na česnek
da: Hvidløgspressere
de: Knoblauchpressen
es: Prensadores de ajos
fr: Presse-ail
it: Spremiaglio
ja: にんにく絞り
nl: Knoflookpersen
no: Hvitløkspresser
pl: Wyciskarki do czosnku
pt: Espremedor de alho
ru: Чеснокодавилки
sv: Vitlökspressar
tr: Sarmısak Eziciler

en: Gelatin Molds
xx: Gelatin Molds
cs: Želatinové formy
da: Geléforme
de: Dessertformen
es: Moldes para gelatina
fr: Moules à jelly
it: Stampi per gelatina
ja: ゼリー型
nl: Gelatinevormen
no: Gelatinformer
pl: Formy do żelatyny
pt: Formas de gelatina
ru: Формы для желе
sv: Gelatinformar
tr: Jelatin Kalıplar

en: Ice Cube Trays
xx: Ice Cube Trays
cs: Formy na led
da: Isterningbakker
de: Eiswürfelformen
es: Bandejas cubiteras
fr: Bacs à glaçons
it: Vaschette del ghiaccio
ja: 製氷皿
nl: Bakjes voor ijsblokjes
no: Isbitbrett
pl: Tacki do kostek lodu
pt: Formas de gelo
ru: Формы для льда
sv: Isformar
tr: Buz Küpü Kalıpları

en: Jerky Guns
xx: Jerky Guns
cs: Plničky na párky a sušené maso
da: Sprøjtepistoler til kød
de: Fleischpistolen
es: Pistolas para cecinas
fr: Pistolets à viande séchée
it: Pistola per strisce di carne essiccata
ja: ジャーキーガン
nl: Jerky-pistolen
no: Jerky-pistoler
pl: Porcjowniki mięsa suszonego „jerky”
pt: Pistolar para fazer tiras de carne seca
ru: Пистолеты для фарша
sv: Jerkyspruta
tr: Et Tabancaları

en: Kitchen Knives
xx: Kitchen Knives
cs: Kuchyňské nože
da: Køkkenknive
de: Küchenmesser
es: Cuchillos de cocina
fr: Couteaux de cuisine, Couteau de cuisine
it: Coltelli da cucina
ja: 包丁
nl: Keukenmessen
no: Kjøkkenkniver
pl: Noże kuchenne
pt: Facas de cozinha
ru: Кухонные ножи
sv: Köksknivar
tr: Mutfak Bıçakları

en: Kitchen Molds
xx: Kitchen Molds
cs: Formy na vaření a pečení
da: Køkkenforme
de: Küchenformen
es: Moldes de cocina
fr: Moules de cuisine
it: Stampi da cucina
ja: 料理用型
nl: Kookvormen
no: Kjøkkenformer
pl: Formy kuchenne
pt: Moldes para cozinha
ru: Кулинарные формы
sv: Köksformar
tr: Mutfak Kalıpları

en: Kitchen Organizers
xx: Kitchen Organizers
cs: Kuchyňské pořadače
da: Køkkenopbevaring
de: Küchenorganizer
es: Organizadores de cocina
fr: Rangements de cuisine
it: Armadi da cucina
ja: キッチン収納用品
nl: Keukenopbergsystemen
no: Kjøkkenordnere
pl: Organizery kuchenne
pt: Organizadores para cozinha
ru: Кухонные органайзеры
sv: Köksorganiserare
tr: Mutfak Düzenleyicileri

en: Can Organizers
xx: Can Organizers
cs: Organizéry na plechovky
da: Dåseopbevaring
de: Konservenregal
es: Organizadores de latas
fr: Range-canettes
it: Organizzatori per lattine
ja: 缶詰収納用品
nl: Opbergsystemen voor blikken
no: Boksordnere
pl: Organizery na puszki
pt: Organizadores de latas
ru: Органайзеры для банок
sv: Burkorganiserare
tr: Konserve Kutusu Düzenleyicileri

en: Drinkware Holders
xx: Drinkware Holders
cs: Regály na skleničky
da: Glasstativer
de: Trinkgefäßhalter
es: Estanterías para cristalería
fr: Rangements pour articles de boisson
it: Espositori per bottiglie
ja: グラス・カップ収納
nl: Glazenrekken
no: Drikkekarstativer
pl: Regały na napoje
pt: Prateleiras para utensílios para bebidas
ru: Стойки для питьевой посуды
sv: Ställ för dryckeskärl
tr: Bardak Rafları